Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 1

General Provisions

57-5-101. Traffic in alcoholic beverages of less than eight percent (8%) permitted — Brewers' and wholesalers' interests restricted.

It is lawful in this state to transport, store, sell, distribute, possess, receive, or manufacture beer, as defined in subsection (b), subject to the privilege taxes and regulations set out and provided for in this part.

Except as otherwise provided for in this part, no brewer or manufacturer of beer shall have any financial or ownership interest, direct or indirect, in the business of or a building containing a wholesale or retail licensee, including to furnish or loan any fixtures of any kind to a retail licensee, and no such brewer or manufacturer shall hold a wholesale or retail license. For purposes of this section, an indirect interest includes any interest acquired by affiliates, subsidiaries, corporate officials, partners, or employees of the brewer or manufacturer.

Except as otherwise provided for in this part, no wholesaler shall hold any financial or ownership interest, direct or indirect, in the business of or a building containing a brewer, manufacturer, or retail licensee, including to furnish or loan any fixtures of any kind to a retail licensee, and no such wholesaler shall hold a manufacturer or retail license.

For purposes of this title, “beer” means beer, ale or other malt beverages, or any other beverages having an alcoholic content of not more than eight percent (8%) by weight, except wine as defined in § 57-3-101; provided, however, that no more than forty-nine percent (49%) of the overall alcoholic content of such beverage may be derived from the addition of flavors and other nonbeverage ingredients containing alcohol.

Upon meeting necessary federal, state and local license requirements, notwithstanding the prohibition of subsection (a), a manufacturer:

May operate as a retailer at the manufacturer's location or a site contiguous thereto for sales of not more than twenty-five thousand (25,000) barrels of beer or high alcohol content beer or both annually for consumption on or off the premises under this chapter as long as the requirements of this chapter concerning the licensing of such retail establishments are met; and

May qualify for and hold a license:

Under chapter 4 of this title as a “restaurant” or “limited service restaurant”; provided, that notwithstanding chapter 4 of this title related to restrictions or prohibitions on licensees under chapter 4, a restaurant or limited service restaurant may sell for off-premises consumption beer manufactured pursuant to this section at such location or at any other restaurant or limited service restaurant licensed under chapter 4 that is owned by the same person; or

As a hotel as defined under § 57-4-102(21)(F)(iii); provided, that the hotel licensee shall only sell beer manufactured pursuant to this section on the premises of the hotel.

A manufacturer operating as a retailer pursuant to subdivision (c)(1)(A) may not sell its beer directly to retailers that are located in a county other than the county in which the manufacturer is located. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any transfer or sale by a manufacturer operating as a retailer to an off-site retailer's location shall constitute a wholesale sale.

Notwithstanding the prohibitions and restrictions on a manufacturer's financial and ownership interests imposed in subsection (a), a manufacturer may have a financial or ownership interest in a licensed wholesaler's business; provided, however, that the financial or ownership interest in the licensed wholesaler's business is maintained or held only for a one-time period not to exceed five (5) years, which may not be directly or indirectly extended or renewed, and only under the following circumstances and conditions:

When a licensed wholesaler is voluntarily selling its distribution rights, and the manufacturer whose brand distribution rights are being sold seeks to assist the sale by taking a noncontrolling financial interest in the purchasing wholesaler in the form of a loan made contemporaneous with the sale and secured by the inventory and assets, except for the corporate stock, of the purchasing wholesaler; or

When, only for reasons permitted under § 57-5-505, § 57-5-506, or § 57-5-507, a distribution agreement between a manufacturer and a wholesaler is not renewed or is otherwise terminated, cancelled, or discontinued, in which event a manufacturer is authorized to appoint a temporary licensed wholesaler to service the manufacturer's brands in the designated sales territory and to take a financial or ownership interest in the temporary licensed wholesaler in connection with the appointment.

Notwithstanding this section to the contrary, a wholesaler that has continuously held a valid wholesale distribution permit, issued pursuant to this section for a period of at least six (6) months prior to March 27, 2015, and has held a direct or indirect interest in a brewer or manufacturer, continuously during that period of time, and holds a trademark or marketing rights to a brand or brands of beer, may continue to hold the interest, and may expand the interest to effect the brewing, bottling, and sales of beer in which the wholesaler holds the trademark or marketing rights.

It is the intent of the general assembly that this subsection (e) be prospective only and not be applicable to compel the divestiture of trademark or marketing rights or a direct or indirect interest held by a wholesaler for the six-month period prior to March 27, 2015.

For purposes of this section, “manufacturer” means:

A holder of a license to manufacture or import beer;

An officer, director, agent, or employee of such a license holder; or

An affiliate of such a license holder, regardless of whether the affiliation is corporate or by management, direction, or control.

Acts 1933, ch. 69, § 1; 1935, ch. 170, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 1191.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-201; Acts 1983, ch. 229, § 7; 1990, ch. 906, § 1; 1991, ch. 214, §§ 1, 2; 1992, ch. 800, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 227, § 1; 1993, ch. 297, § 1; 1995, ch. 395, §§ 1-6; 2004, ch. 956, §§ 1, 2; 2005, ch. 298, §§ 2, 3; 2009, ch. 290, §§ 1, 2; 2013, ch. 386, §§ 1, 3; 2014, ch. 861, §§ 2, 17. 2015, ch. 19, §§ 1, 2; 2015, ch. 176, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Privilege tax on manufacture of intoxicants with alcoholic content of more than five percent, §§57-2-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Contracts, § 117; 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 5, 6, 9, 28.

Law Reviews.

Preferences, Priorities, and Powers of the State in the Collection of Delinquent Revenue: Tennessee's Tax Enforcement Procedures Act (Donald J. Serkin), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 707.

Attorney General Opinions. Fees for background checks of employees of beer licensees, OAG 97-077 (5/21/97).

A beer manufacturer may operate as a retailer under T.C.A. §57-5-101(c)(1)(A) and at the same time hold a restaurant license pursuant to T.C.A. §57-5-101(c)(1)(B), OAG 00-087 (5/5/00).

If a beer manufacturer holds a restaurant permit under the provisions of title 57, chapter 4, as allowed by T.C.A. §57-5-101(c)(1)(B), it will also be able to obtain a retail beer permit for the restaurant premises, OAG 00-087 (5/5/00).

A beer manufacturer may not sell, give, or otherwise transfer beer to a beer retailer or restaurant that sells beer where the manufacturer has a direct or indirect interest in the retailer or restaurant, OAG 00-087 (5/5/00).

The statute prohibits the sale of beer by a manufacturer at a site it owns that is non-contiguous with its manufacturing facility, OAG 00-087 (5/5/00).

The statute does not allow for different distance standards to be adopted and applied to different types of establishments that sell beer; only one distance standard may be established and it must apply to all establishments selling beer, whether for consumption on or off the premises, OAG 01-157 (10/25/01).

The legality of an exclusive sponsorship agreement whereby an alcoholic beverage manufacturer or other industry member would pay to sponsor an event in exchange for an agreement that the sponsor’s product will be served exclusively at the event would depend on the specific facts of the agreement and the status of the parties to the agreement, including whether the parties are licensed wholesalers or retailers and whether the agreement involves alcoholic beverages or beer. OAG 18-35, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 34 (7/30/2018).

57-5-102. Registration of manufacturers and wholesale distributors.

Every person, firm, corporation, joint-stock company, syndicate or association in this state engaging in the manufacture or wholesale distribution of beer shall be required to first register its name and address, by mail or in person, at the office of the commissioner of revenue and to receive and keep posted at its usual place of business a certificate of registration bearing a serial number, which serial number shall be assigned to such person, firm, corporation, joint-stock company, syndicate or association in this state by the commissioner. The registration shall be made and certificate of registration received and posted before commencement of any business as described herein.

Cost of such registration is fixed at twenty dollars ($20.00) for wholesalers and forty dollars ($40.00) for manufacturers, to be paid by the applicant before a certificate is issued. Such certificate must be renewed annually on or before January 1, upon the payment of the aforementioned registration fees.

Any person required by this section to be registered who shall fail to register with the commissioner within twenty (20) days after entering business, or who shall fail to obtain a renewal of such registration for the current year by January 20 thereof, shall have added to the cost of registration a specific penalty of five dollars ($5.00) a month for each month or fractional part thereof during which such failure continues, but not to exceed an amount equal to the registration fee.

The proceeds of these fees shall be divided equally, one-half (½) to the department and one-half (½) to the Tennessee highway patrol, and shall be accredited to the expendable receipts account of such departments in order that same may be available for the purpose of enforcing this chapter.

In addition to the specific mandatory penalty provided for hereinabove, any person who shall engage in any business or activity for which a certificate of registration is knowingly required from the commissioner under this chapter without first having obtained such a certificate, or who, having obtained such a certificate, shall continue to engage in and/or conduct such business or activity after such certificate shall have been revoked or who does so during a suspension thereof, shall be liable to a discretionary penalty of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) to be imposed by the commissioner at the commissioner's discretion. Such penalty shall be collected in the manner otherwise provided for the collection of taxes and penalties and distributed in the manner provided hereinabove. Each day that such business or activity is so engaged in or conducted may be deemed a separate offense by the commissioner at the commissioner's discretion upon determination that the circumstances warrant.

Every person, firm, corporation, joint-stock company, syndicate or association, before being permitted to store, sell, distribute and/or manufacture beer shall pay such license, and comply with such regulations and ordinances as may be passed by the county courts of the counties and/or enacted by the proper municipal authorities of the cities or towns where such person, firm, corporation, joint-stock company, syndicate or association may do business in the manner hereinafter provided.

Acts 1933, ch. 69, § 5; 1937, ch. 198, § 1; 1943, ch. 53, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 1191.5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; Acts 1972, ch. 448, § 1; 1973, ch. 68, § 6; 1974, ch. 478, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-202; Acts 1985, ch. 315, § 1; 1993, ch. 297, § 2.

57-5-103. Permit from county or city required — Online sale for curbside pickup — Classification of counties — Purchases of beer “for resale.”

It is unlawful to operate any business engaged in the sale, distribution, manufacture, or storage of beer without a permit issued by the county or city where such business is located under the authority herein delegated to counties and cities.

Permits shall be issued to the owner of the business or other entity responsible for the premises for which the permit is sought, whether a person, firm, corporation, joint-stock company, syndicate, association, or local governmental entity where the governing body has authorized such sales of beer.

A permit shall be valid:

Only for the owner to whom the permit is issued and cannot be transferred to another owner. If the owner is a corporation, a change in ownership shall occur when control of at least fifty percent (50%) of the stock of the corporation is transferred to a new owner;

Only for a single location, except as provided in subdivision (a)(4), and cannot be transferred to another location. A permit shall be valid for all decks, patios and other outdoor serving areas that are contiguous to the exterior of the building in which the business is located and that are operated by the business; and

Only for a business operating under the name identified in the permit application.

Where an owner operates two (2) or more restaurants or other businesses within the same building, the owner may in the owner's discretion operate some or all such businesses pursuant to the same permit.

A business can sell beer for both on-premises and off-premises consumption at the same location pursuant to one (1) permit.

A permit holder must return a permit to the county or city that issued it within fifteen (15) days of termination of the business, change in ownership, relocation of the business or change of the business's name; provided, that notwithstanding the failure to return a beer permit, a permit shall expire on termination of the business, change in ownership, relocation of the business or change of the business's name.

In the case of beer wholesalers, as defined in § 57-6-102, no county or city shall require a permit from a wholesaler unless such wholesaler operates a warehouse in such county or city.

Any person, firm, corporation, joint-stock company, syndicate, or association engaged in the sale, distribution, or manufacture of beer without the permit required by this part commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as granting counties or cities the authority to require the periodic renewal of beer permits.

After July 1, 2015, a city or county shall not issue a permit under this chapter unless the applicant has been a citizen or lawful resident of the United States for not less than one (1) year immediately preceding the date upon which the application is made to the city or county.

A permit holder may sell beer online for curbside pickup at the permit holder's location. Purchased beer must be delivered to the customer's vehicle, and the vehicle must be located within a paved parking area adjacent to the place of business. Beer sold through an online curbside pickup service must be pulled from the inventory located at the permitted location of the retailer providing the service and may not be pulled from the inventory of another retailer or permitted location. Any employee bringing beer to a vehicle for online curbside pickup must confirm the individual receiving the beer is at least twenty-one (21) years of age.

For the purpose of licensing, regulating and controlling the transportation, storage, sale, distribution, possession, receipt and/or manufacture of beer pursuant to this chapter, the counties of the state shall be classified in two (2) categories, one (1) of which is hereby designated Class A counties consisting of those counties not governed by metropolitan governments as defined in § 7-2-101, and the other category is hereby designated Class B counties consisting of those counties governed by metropolitan governments as defined in § 7-2-101.

When either “county” or “counties” is used in this chapter, it means counties generally without reference to the classification of counties provided for in this section, and the use of “county” or “counties” shall cause the provision limited by the word “county” or “counties” to apply equally to Class A counties and to Class B counties. When “county legislative body” or “county legislative bodies” is used in this chapter, it means “metropolitan council” or “metropolitan councils” when applicable to Class B counties.

It is unlawful for any person to sell, distribute or manufacture beer without having a valid certificate indicating that purchases of beer by that person are “for resale” as that term is used in § 67-6-102(75)(A).

Within ten (10) days after being issued a permit to sell, distribute or manufacture beer, a person shall file with the county or city issuing the permit and with each person from whom the person buys beer a copy of a valid certificate indicating that the purchases of beer are “for resale” as that term is used in § 67-6-102(75)(A), and shall subsequently maintain at all times a valid resale certificate on file with the county or city issuing the permit and with each person from whom the person buys beer.

A city or county is authorized to seek criminal history background or fingerprint checks on applicants. Criminal background checks may include fingerprint checks against state and federal criminal records maintained by the Tennessee bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation. The Tennessee bureau of investigation is authorized to assess fees for the searches in accordance with the fee schedule established by the bureaus.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no city or county shall deny the issuance or renewal of a permit upon the basis that the lease between the business and its municipal landlord includes a provision whereby gross sales, which may include or exclude liquor sales, are considered in the determination of a percentage rent or other rent calculation provision.

Acts 1933, ch. 69, § 9c; C. Supp. 1950, § 1191.12; Acts 1963, ch. 76, § 1; 1965, ch. 321, § 1; 1974, ch. 478, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-204; Acts 1983, ch. 386, § 1; 1987, ch. 254, § 1; 1991, ch. 424, § 1; 1993, ch. 297, § 4; T.C.A., §57-5-104; Acts 1996, ch. 641, § 2; 2009, ch. 314, § 1; 2010, ch. 1002, § 1; 2014, ch. 754, § 1; 2015, ch. 29, § 1; 2018, ch. 944, § 3; 2019, ch. 377, § 3; 2020, ch. 704, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §57-5-103, concerning permits to aliens, was transferred to §57-5-104 in 1993.

Pursuant to Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Tennessee, Acts 2014, ch. 754 took effect on April 21, 2014.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “local governmental entity” for “governmental entity” in (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment added (f).

The 2020 amendment added (a)(11).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 944, § 4. May 15, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 377, § 4. May 10, 2019.

Acts 2020, ch. 704, § 2, June 22, 2020.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 5-7, 9, 10, 16, 21.

Law Reviews.

Judicial Review and the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act (Toxey H. Sewell), 6 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 253.

Attorney General Opinions. A clubhouse or restaurant beer permit holder located on a golf course cannot sell beer to individuals on the course itself, away from the building, under any circumstances, OAG 01-117 (7/24/01).

Prohibiting the sale of beer through drive-up windows. OAG 10-113, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 119 (11/18/10).

As a municipal corporation the city of Clarksville cannot obtain a license to sell liquor by the drink at any location or sell alcoholic beverages or beer to either private party lessees and guests or to the general public; no city employee or nonprofit corporation created or controlled by the city may obtain a permit to sell liquor by the drink or obtain a beer permit on behalf of the city. OAG 14-03, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 5 (1/9/14)

The durational citizenship/residency requirement imposed by 2015 Tenn. Pub. Acts, Chapter 29 for the issuance of a beer permit is unlikely to pass constitutional muster. OAG 16-09, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 9 (3/4/2016).

57-5-104. Application fee — Privilege tax — Permits.

Each applicant for a permit required by § 57-5-103 shall be required to pay an application fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) to the county or city in which the applicant's place of business is located. No portion of the fee shall be refunded to the applicant, notwithstanding whether an application is approved or denied.

There is hereby imposed on the business of selling, distributing, storing or manufacturing beer in this state a privilege tax of one hundred dollars ($100), notwithstanding § 57-6-112.

Any person, firm, corporation, joint-stock company, syndicate or association engaged in selling, distributing, storing or manufacturing beer shall remit the tax on January 1 to the county or city in which such business is located. The tax shall be remitted to the county clerk for businesses located in the county outside the incorporated limits of any city or town, and to the official identified by the city or town in the notice required by subdivision (b)(3) for businesses located within the incorporated limits of the city or town.

Counties and cities shall mail written notice to each permit holder of the payment date of the annual tax at least thirty (30) days prior to January 1. Notice shall be mailed to the address specified by the permit holder on its permit application. If a permit holder does not pay the tax by January 31 or within thirty (30) days after written notice of the tax was mailed, whichever is later, then the county or city shall notify the permit holder by certified mail that the tax payment is past due. If a permit holder does not pay the tax within ten (10) days after receiving notice of its delinquency by certified mail, then the county or city may suspend or revoke the permit or impose a civil penalty pursuant to § 57-5-108.

Counties, cities or towns may utilize these tax funds for any public purpose.

At the time a new permit is issued to any business subject to this tax, the permit holder shall be required to pay the privilege tax on a prorated basis for each month or portion thereof remaining until the next tax payment date.

Acts 1933, ch. 69, § 9b; C. Supp. 1950, § 1191.11; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-203; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; T.C.A., §57-5-103; Acts 1993, ch. 297, § 3; 1995, ch. 124, §§ 1, 2; 1996, ch. 641, §§ 3, 4.

Compiler's Notes. Former §57-5-104, concerning county and city alcoholic beverage permits, was transferred to §57-5-103 in 1993.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality, OAG 94-064 (4/28/94).

57-5-105. Licenses or permits to sell outside of town or city limits — Applications — Temporary permits — Hearings.

The owner of a business desiring to sell, distribute, manufacture, or store beer in any Class A county outside the limits of any incorporated city or town shall file an application for a permit with the county legislative body or a committee appointed by the county legislative body.

In order to receive a permit, an applicant must establish that:

No beer will be sold except at places where such sale will not cause congestion of traffic or interference with schools, churches, or other places of public gathering, or otherwise interfere with public health, safety and morals, the county legislative body having the right to forbid such storage, sale or manufacture at places within two thousand feet (2,000') of such places of public gatherings in its discretion. Nothing in this subdivision (b)(1) shall apply to places of business that are located in the terminal or main building at public airports serviced by commercial airlines with regularly scheduled flights;

No sale shall be made to minors;

No person, firm, corporation, joint-stock company, syndicate, or association having at least a five percent (5%) ownership interest in the applicant has been convicted of any violation of the laws against possession, sale, manufacture, or transportation of beer or other alcoholic beverages, or the manufacture, delivery, sale or possession with intent to manufacture, deliver or sell any controlled substance or controlled substance analogue, or any crime involving moral turpitude within the past ten (10) years;

No person employed by the applicant in such distribution or sale has been convicted of any violation of the laws against possession, sale, manufacture, or transportation of beer or other alcoholic beverages, or the manufacture, delivery, sale or possession with intent to manufacture, deliver or sell any controlled substance that is listed in Schedules I through V in title 39, chapter 17, part 4, or the manufacture, delivery, sale or possession with intent to manufacture, deliver or sell any controlled substance analogue, or any crime involving moral turpitude within the past ten (10) years; and

No sale shall be made for on-premise consumption unless the application so states.

An applicant shall disclose the following information in the application:

Name of the applicant;

Name of applicant's business;

Location of business by street address or other geographical description to permit an accurate determination of conformity with the requirements of this section;

If beer will be sold at two (2) or more restaurants or other businesses pursuant to the same permit as provided by § 57-5-103(a)(4), a description of all such businesses;

Persons, firms, corporations, joint-stock companies, syndicates, or associations having at least a five percent (5%) ownership interest in the applicant;

Identity and address of a representative to receive annual tax notices and any other communication from the county legislative body or its committee;

That no person, firm, joint-stock company, syndicate, or association having at least a five percent (5%) ownership interest in the applicant nor any person to be employed in the distribution or sale of beer has been convicted of any violation of the laws against possession, sale, manufacture, or transportation of beer or other alcoholic beverages or any crime involving moral turpitude within the past ten (10) years;

Whether or not the applicant is seeking a permit which would allow the sale of beer either for on-premises consumption or for off-premises consumption, or both of the foregoing. If a holder of a beer permit for either off-premises consumption or on-premises consumption desires to change the permit holder's method of sale, the permit holder shall apply to the county legislative body or committee appointed by such body for a new permit; and

Such other relevant information as may be required by the county legislative body or its committee. An applicant or permit holder shall be required to amend or supplement its application promptly if a change in circumstances affects the responses provided in its application.

Any applicant making a false statement in the application shall forfeit such applicant's permit and shall not be eligible to receive any permit for a period of ten (10) years.

Any applicant seeking a license or permit under this section and who complies with the conditions and provisions of this section shall have issued to such applicant the necessary license or permit, and in the event the license or permit is refused, the applicant shall be entitled to a hearing on the application for the issuance of a license or permit. The refusal to grant a license or permit, or the refusal to grant a hearing upon a person's application for a license or permit, may be reviewed by the circuit or chancery court in the manner as authorized under § 57-5-108.

Before any county legislative body or committee appointed by the county legislative body shall issue a license or permit under this section, it may cause to be published in a newspaper of general circulation a notice in which the name of the applicant and the address of the location for such license or permit, whether the application is for the sale of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption and the date and time of its meeting at which such application shall be considered. Such meeting shall be a public hearing for the purpose of hearing the statement of any person or such person's attorney on any application for a license or permit.

Temporary beer licenses or permits not to exceed thirty (30) days' duration may be issued at the request of the applicant upon the same conditions governing permanent permits. Such a temporary license or permit shall not allow the sale, storage or manufacture of beer on publicly owned property.

Notwithstanding the prohibition concerning beer sales on publicly owned property in this subsection (g), in Class B counties and counties having a population in excess of three hundred thousand (300,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census a temporary permit authorizing the sale of beer on public property may be issued to a bona fide charitable or nonprofit or political organization as defined in § 57-4-102, subject to the approval of the appropriate governmental authority charged with the management of such publicly owned property and the approval of the county beer board.

Notwithstanding the prohibition concerning beer sales on publicly owned property in this subsection (g), a county authorized to issue a permit under § 57-5-106(c) may issue a temporary permit authorizing the sale of beer on public property.

Where a permit or license has been refused three (3) times, the applicant shall not be allowed to apply again for a permit or license on the same premises until after the expiration of one (1) year from the date of the third refusal and only if the circumstances have substantially changed. Nothing in this subsection (h) shall be construed as prohibiting or in any manner limiting the right of any refusal to be reviewed by the circuit or chancery court in the manner as authorized under § 57-5-108.

Class A counties, by resolution of their county legislative bodies, may forbid the sale of beer within three hundred feet (300') of a residential dwelling, measured from building to building; provided, that the owner of the residential dwelling appears in person before the county beer board and objects to the issuance of such permit or license. This subsection (i) shall not apply to locations where beer permits or licenses have been issued prior to the date of adoption of such a resolution by the county legislative body, or to an application for a change in the licensee or permittee at such locations.

A county legislative body may impose training or certification restrictions or requirements on employees of a permit holder, but such restrictions or requirements shall not apply to any employee who is possessed of a server permit issued by the alcoholic beverage commission pursuant to chapter 3, part 7 of this title.

When a permit or license has been denied based on the testimony of a person at the hearing which caused the county to deny the permit or license, the beer board or other appropriate governing body shall notify the person who testified if the applicant seeks a permit or license again at the same location within twelve (12) months. The person who testified may submit the person's remarks in writing to the beer board or other appropriate governing body at any additional hearing in lieu of making a physical appearance to testify.

Acts 1933, ch. 69, § 10; 1935, ch. 170, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 1191.14; Acts 1961, ch. 105, § 1; 1965, ch. 321, § 2; 1968, ch. 517, § 1; 1972, ch. 637, § 1; 1975, ch. 242, § 1; 1975, ch. 363, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 713, § 1; 1977, ch. 340, § 1; 1978, ch. 637, § 1; 1978, ch. 799, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-205; Acts 1980, ch. 909, § 1; 1983, ch. 386, §§ 2-5; 1984, ch. 610, § 1; 1987, ch. 74, §§ 1-3; 1993, ch. 297, § 5; 1995, ch. 252, § 1; 1995, ch. 396, § 7; 2004, ch. 598, § 1; 2005, ch. 294, §§ 1, 2; 2012, ch. 848, §§ 61, 62; 2016, ch. 654, §§ 1, 2; 2018, ch. 944, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (g)(3).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 944, § 4. May 15, 2018.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attorney General, § 3; 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 2-9, 12, 22; 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, § 52.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Protection of Aliens, 40 Tenn. L. Rev. 235.

Attorney General Opinions. Whether a public cemetery constitutes a public gathering place, OAG 91-57 (6/10/91).

Public cemetery may constitute a public gathering place, OAG 92-51 (9/16/92).

Distance requirements for beer sales in Washington County, OAG 94-110 (10/6/94).

Authority of board, committee, or individual members to revoke beer permits, OAG 97-060 (5/1/97).

Private day care center as place of public gathering, 98-069 (3/25/98).

Applicability of local beer permit ordinance to liquor-by-the-drink license holders, OAG 99-098 (4/30/99).

The statute does not allow for different distance standards to be adopted and applied to different types of establishments that sell beer; only one distance standard may be established and it must apply to all establishments selling beer, whether for consumption on or off the premises, OAG 01-157 (10/25/01).

A beer board may not revoke a beer permit solely on the basis that the business is located within 2,000 feet of a church, if the church was built after the business was granted the permit, OAG 02-061 (5/8/02).

A county that has enacted an ordinance that prohibits the sale, storage, or manufacture of beer within 2,000 feet of a church, school, or other place of public gathering may amend the ordinance to protect the beer permits of businesses that have places of public gathering built within 2,000 feet of their premises after the issuance of their beer permits, although such an amendment is probably unnecessary, OAG 02-061 (5/8/02).

Different distance requirements for the sale of beer for different sections of a city would be permissible so long as the different sections are well defined and permit holders or permit applicants within each section are treated the same, OAG 02-092 (8/28/02).

If a county legislative body had passed a resolution prohibiting the issuance of a beer permit for locations within two thousand feet of schools, churches, or other places of public gathering, and later issued permits in violation of such distance requirement, could not at a later date readopt such a distance restriction, the effect of which would basically grandfather all such permits without revoking all permits issued in violation of the earlier adopted distance, OAG 04-012 (2/03/04).

A county legislative body may adopt a distance requirement of less than two thousand feet by setting the distance at a point which would basically grandfather all permits issued in violation of an earlier two thousand foot distance, OAG 04-012 (2/03/04).

A Class A county does not have the authority to prohibit the sale of cold beer, iced or mechanically cooled, at convenience stores and grocery stores in the unincorporated areas of the county, OAG 05-024 (3/14/05).

A Class A county does not have the authority to prohibit the sale of cold beer, iced or mechanically cooled, at convenience stores and grocery stores in the unincorporated areas of the county through a private act passed by the General Assembly, OAG 05-024 (3/14/05).

The 300-foot distance under T.C.A. §57-5-105(i) should be measured from the nearest portion of the entire building in which sales of beer occur, OAG 05-144 (9/27/05).

Implementation of beer permit distance requirement. OAG 10-98, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 108 (9/15/10).

Prohibiting the sale of beer through drive-up windows. OAG 10-113, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 119 (11/18/10).

Issuance of beer permits near cemeteries. OAG 12-02, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 7 (1/6/12).